Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 4. Depots; Sale of Tickets; Demurrage

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Railroad carrier's liability for loss of baggage or effects accompanying passenger, 32 ALR2d 630.

Carrier's duty and liability to its passenger injured on platform or the like of station or terminal owned by other company, 41 ALR2d 1286.

§ 37-9-401.
Establishment of depots; when required; deviation to avoid establishment prohibited.

No railroad company shall construct or operate a railroad within four (4) miles of any existing town or city without providing a suitable depot or stopping place at the nearest practicable point for the convenience of said town or city, and stopping all trains doing local business at said stopping place. No railroad company shall deviate from the most direct practicable line in constructing a railroad for the purpose of avoiding the provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 133, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 4209; C.S. 1920, § 5381; R.S. 1931, § 96-119; C.S. 1945, § 65-301; W.S. 1957, § 37-214.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision requiring railroads within 4 miles of city or town to provide depot or stopping place, see art. 10, § 19, Wyo. Const.

As to obtaining property of state institutions for depot purposes, see art. 2 of this chapter.

§ 37-9-402.
Establishment of depots; prosecution; notice to railroad.

Whenever it shall come to the knowledge of the district attorney for any county in this state, or whenever complaint shall be made to such officer by any citizen or citizens thereof, that any railroad corporation or company doing business and running trains in or through such county is neglecting or refusing to provide a suitable depot or stopping place as provided by W.S.

37-9-401

, or violating any of the provisions thereof, it shall be the duty of the district attorney to make a personal examination of the conditions complained of and if he finds that such railroad corporation or company has not provided a suitable depot or stopping place for the convenience of any town or city, and is not stopping all trains doing local business thereat, he shall at once prepare and cause the sheriff of his county to serve a written notice on any officer or agent of such railroad corporation or company to be found in said county to the effect that such violation exists in the vicinity of a certain town or city, naming it, and notifying said company that unless remedied within thirty (30) days from the date of the service of said notice, and in strict compliance with W.S.

37-9-401

, proceedings against said derelict company will be commenced in the district court of such county to compel such compliance, and also to enforce the penalty provided for in W.S.

37-9-403

.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 133, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 4210; C.S. 1920, § 5382; R.S. 1931, § 96-120; C.S. 1945, § 65-302; W.S. 1957, § 37-215; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1.

§ 37-9-403.
Establishment of depots; penalty.

If, after the expiration of thirty (30) days from the service of the notice hereinbefore specified, the said railroad corporation or company still neglects or refuses to comply with the term of such notice and with the provisions of W.S.

37-9-401

, it shall, on conviction, be fined in the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day of such delinquency after the expiration of such thirty (30) days notice, up to, and including the day and date on which judgment may be rendered, and also for costs of suit, recoverable by an action in the district court of such county to be brought by the district attorney thereof, and all fines collected under this statute shall be covered into the treasury of the county in which such action is brought. It shall also be the duty of the district attorney aforesaid to promptly institute mandamus proceedings against such derelict railroad corporation or company in the district court to enforce the provisions of W.S.

37-9-401

through

37-9-403

.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 133, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 4211; C.S. 1920, § 5383; R.S. 1931, § 96-121; C.S. 1945, § 65-303; W.S. 1957, § 37-216; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to mandamus, see §§

1-30-101

to

1-30-118

.

§ 37-9-404.
Sale of tickets; agent to have certificate of authority.

It shall be the duty of the owner or owners of any railroad or other conveyance for the transportation of passengers to provide each agent who may be authorized to sell tickets or other certificates, entitling the holder to travel upon any railroad or other public conveyance, with a certificate, setting forth the authority of such agent to make such sales, which certificate shall be duly attested by the corporate seal, if such there be, of the owner of such railroad or other public conveyance and also by the signature of the owner or officer whose name is signed upon the tickets or coupons which such agent may sell.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 130, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1942; R.S. 1899, § 2259; C.S. 1910, § 3074; C.S. 1920, § 3838; R.S. 1931, § 96-401; C.S. 1945, § 65-304; W.S. 1957, § 37-217.

Cross references. —

As to unlawful riding on railroad trains, see §§

37-12-104

to

37-12-107

.

§ 37-9-405.
Sale of tickets; sale without certificate prohibited.

It shall not be lawful for any person not possessed of such authority so evidenced, to sell, barter or transfer, for any consideration whatever, the whole or any part of any ticket or tickets, passes or other evidences of the holder’s title to travel on any railroad or other public conveyance, whether the same be situated, operated or owned within or without the limits of this state, except as authorized by this act [§§

37-9-404

through

37-9-408

].

History.

Laws 1877, p. 130, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1943; R.S. 1899, § 2260; C.S. 1910, § 3075; C.S. 1920, § 3839; R.S. 1931, § 96-402; C.S. 1945, § 65-305; W.S. 1957, § 37-218.

§ 37-9-406.
Sale of tickets; penalty for violating W.S. 37-9-405.

Any person or persons violating the provisions of the preceding section [§

37-9-405

] shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be liable to be punished by a fine of not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00) and by imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or either or both, in the discretion of the court in which such person or persons shall be convicted.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 130, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1944; R.S. 1899, § 2261; C.S. 1910, § 3076; C.S. 1920, § 3840; R.S. 1931, § 96-403; C.S. 1945, § 65-306; W.S. 1957, § 37-219.

§ 37-9-407.
Sale of tickets; certificate of authority to be posted; form.

It shall be the duty of every agent who shall be authorized to sell tickets or parts of tickets, or other evidences of the holder’s title to travel, to exhibit to any person desiring to purchase a ticket, or to any officer of the law who may request him, the certificate of his authority thus to sell, and to keep said certificate posted in a conspicuous place in his office, for the information of travelers, in substantially the following form:

Agent's Certificate. To whom it may concern: Notice is hereby given that is an agent in the employ of company at authorized to sell tickets entitling the holder to travel upon Witness the corporate seal of company, and the hand of General passenger and ticket agent.

Click to view

History.

Laws 1877, p. 130, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 1945; R.S. 1899, § 2262; C.S. 1910, § 3077; C.S. 1920, § 3841; R.S. 1931, § 96-404; C.S. 1945, § 65-307; W.S. 1957, § 37-220.

§ 37-9-408.
Sale of tickets; unused tickets redeemable; sale of unused ticket by purchaser.

It shall be the duty of the owner or owners of railroads, or other public conveyances, to provide for the redemption of the whole or any parts, or coupons of any ticket or tickets, as they may have sold, as the purchaser for any reason has not used and does not desire to use, at a rate which shall be equal to the difference between the price paid for the whole ticket and the cost of a ticket between the points for which the proportion of said ticket was actually used; and the sale by any person of the unused portion of any ticket otherwise than by the presentation of the same for redemption, as provided for in this section, shall be deemed to be a violation of the provisions of this act [§§

37-9-404

through

37-9-408

], and shall be punished as hereinbefore provided; provided, that this act shall not apply to the sale of first-class tickets; and provided, that this act shall not prohibit any person who has purchased a regular first-class ticket from any agent authorized by this act with the bona fide intention of traveling upon the same the whole distance between the points named in the said ticket, from selling the unused part of the same to any other person, if such person travels upon the same, unless said tickets shall be special contract tickets and the local fare to the point to which said ticket may be used shall equal the price paid for such special contract ticket.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 130, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 1946; R.S. 1899, § 2263; C.S. 1910, § 3078; C.S. 1920, § 3842; R.S. 1931, § 96-405; C.S. 1945, § 65-308; W.S. 1957, § 37-221.

§ 37-9-409.
Demurrage on cars.

All railroads, shipping cars, or parts of cars of all commodities, from any point in the state of Wyoming, to consignees in any other part of this state, shall give time, free of charge, for loading and unloading said cars, or parts of cars, as follows: All loaded cars, taking track delivery, which are to be unloaded by the consignee thereof, or the party whose interest may appear, or cars set for loading which are to be loaded by consignor, shall be limited to forty-eight (48) hours of free time, computed from seven (7:00) o’clock a.m., of the day following the day legal notice of arrival is given (having been placed at an accessible point for unloading), and may be subject thereafter to a charge of one dollar ($1.00) per car for each day, or fraction of a day, that they may remain unloaded, in possession of the railroad company after said free time; provided, however, that if after placing a car, or cars, as required in this section, the railroad company shall, during or after free time, temporarily remove all, or any of them, or in any way obstruct the unloading of same, the consignee shall not be chargeable with the delay caused thereby; provided, that when on account of delay or irregularity of transportation, cars are bunched and delivered to consignee in numbers beyond his reasonable ability to load and unload within the free time prescribed by these rules, he shall be allowed by the carrier such additional time as may be necessary to load and unload cars, so in excess, by the exercise of usual diligence on the part of the consignee.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 54, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 5384; R.S. 1931, § 96-122; C.S. 1945, § 65-309; W.S. 1957, § 37-222.

§ 37-9-410.
Additional charges for delay forbidden.

Any railroad company, operating within the state of Wyoming, and transporting commodities from a consignor to a consignee, within this state, shall not charge to either the consignor, or consignee of said commodities any additional sum of money, for freight or transportation, on account of any delay in the transportation or delivery of same, not caused by the direct act or agency of the said consignor or consignee.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 54, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 5385; R.S. 1931, § 96-123; C.S. 1945, § 65-310; W.S. 1957, § 37-223.